Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 11 Nonadmitted Insurance
§ 26-11-113.
Surplus lines broker's license; suspension or revocation; grounds; procedure.

The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and in accordance with W.S.

26-2-125

through

26-2-129

, place on probation, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew any surplus lines broker’s license or other license issued under this title, or may levy a civil penalty in accordance with W.S.

26-1-107

or any combination of actions for any one (1) or more of the following causes:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 3.

Removal of the resident surplus lines broker’s office from this state;

Removal of the resident surplus lines broker’s office accounts and records from this state during the period during which the accounts and records are required to be maintained under W.S.

26-11-116

;

Failure to make and file required reports when due;

Failure to remit the tax on surplus lines premiums as provided in this chapter;

Failure to maintain a bond as required by W.S.

26-11-114

;

Violation of any provision of this chapter; or

For any cause for which an insurance license could be denied, revoked, suspended or renewal refused under chapter 9 of this title.

The procedures provided by chapter 9 of this code for suspension or revocation of licenses apply to suspension or revocation of a surplus line broker’s license.

Upon suspending or revoking the broker’s surplus line license, the commissioner shall also suspend or revoke all other licenses of or as to the same individual under this code.

No broker whose license is suspended or revoked shall again be licensed until any fines or delinquent taxes he owes are paid, or, in case of revocation, until after expiration of one (1) year from the date revocation is final.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 220; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-220; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, §§ 2, 5; 2012, ch. 37, §§ 2, 3.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted the introductory language of (a) for “The commissioner may suspend or revoke any surplus line broker's license”; repealed former (a)(i) and (ii) pertaining to inconsistent provisions; and added (a)(iii) through (a)(ix)..

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 26-11-114.
Surplus line broker's bond.

Prior to issuance of a license as a surplus line broker, the applicant shall file with the commissioner and thereafter for as long as the license remains in effect shall keep in force a bond in favor of the state of Wyoming in the penal sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), with an authorized corporate surety the commissioner approves, conditioned that he will conduct business under the license in accordance with this chapter and that he will promptly remit the taxes provided by W.S.

26-11-118

. The aggregate liability of the surety for any claims on the bond shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond. The bond shall not be terminated unless not less than thirty (30) days prior written notice thereof is given to the licensee and filed with the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 221; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-221; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2.

§ 26-11-115.
Surplus lines broker may accept and place business from producers.

A licensed surplus lines broker may accept and place surplus line business for any insurance producer licensed in this state for the kind of insurance involved and may compensate the producer therefor.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 222; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-222; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “surplus lines broker” for “surplus line broker,” “insurance producer” for “insurance agent,” and “producer therefor” for “agent therefor.”

§ 26-11-116.
Records of broker; contents; examination.

Each surplus lines broker shall keep in his office a full and true record of each surplus lines insurance contract placed by or through the broker for which this state is the home state of the insured, including a copy of the policy, certificate, cover note or other evidence of insurance showing each of the following applicable items:

Amount of the insurance, risks and perils insured;

Gross premium charged;

Return premium paid, if any;

Rate of premium charged upon the several items of property;

Effective date of contract and the terms thereof;

Name and address of each insurer on the direct risk and the proportion of the entire risk assumed by each insurer if less than the entire risk;

Name and address of the insured;

Brief general description of the property or risk insured and where located or to be performed;

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 3.

Amount of tax and other sums to be collected from the insured;

Allocation of taxes by state as referred to in W.S.

26-11-118

;

Identity of the producer, any confirming correspondence from the insurer or its representative, and the application; and

Any other information the commissioner requires.

The record of each contract shall be kept open at all reasonable times to examination by the commissioner without notice for a period of not less than five (5) years following termination of the contract. In lieu of maintaining offices in this state, each nonresident surplus lines broker shall make available to the commissioner any and all records that the commissioner deems necessary for examination.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 223; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-223; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2; 2012, ch. 37, §§ 2, 3; 2016 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2012 amendment,

rewrote the introductory language of (a), which formerly read: “Each broker shall keep in his office a full and true record of each surplus line coverage he procures, including a copy of each daily report, if any, a copy of each certificate of insurance he issues and any of the following applicable items”; added “risks and perils insured” to (a)(i); repealed former (a)(ix), which read: “Any other information the commissioner requires”; added (a)(x) through (xiii); and rewrote (b), which formerly read: “The record shall be open to examination by the commissioner at all times within five (5) years after issuance of the coverage to which it relates.”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and” at the end of (a)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

The Revisor’s Bill,
Laws 2016, ch. 78, § 3 states as follows: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 26-11-117.
Surplus lines broker affidavit report.

Each surplus lines broker, on or before February 15, May 15, August 15 and November 15 of each year, if applicable, shall file with the commissioner an affidavit report verifying that all surplus lines insurance transacted during the preceding calendar quarter has been submitted as required by the commissioner.

The affidavit report of the surplus lines broker shall be in the form and manner the commissioner prescribes. The report shall include a statement as to the diligent efforts made to place the coverage with admitted insurers, the results thereof and any additional information required by the commissioner.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 207.

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 45, § 2.

An alternative reporting and tax payment period may be required by participation in a multistate compact, reciprocal agreement or clearinghouse pursuant to W.S.

26-11-123

.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 45, § 2.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 224; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-224; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 207; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (b)(i), which read: “Gross amount of each kind of insurance transacted.”

The 2012 amendment,

in (a), added “surplus lines,” and substituted “report” for “statement”; in the introductory language of (b), substituted “report” for “statement,” and deleted “and furnishes” after “prescribes”; in (b), substituted “written” for “charged” in (b)(ii), added (b)(vi) and (vii), and made related changes; and added (c) and (d).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote (a), which read “Each surplus lines broker, annually, on or before March 1, shall file with the commissioner a verified report of all surplus line insurance he transacted during the preceding calendar year”; designated and rewrote the introductory language of (b) as (b), which read “The report shall be on forms the commissioner prescribes and shall show”; repealed (b)(ii) through (b)(vii), which read “(ii) Aggregate gross premiums written; (iii) Aggregate of returned premiums paid to insureds; (iv) Aggregate of net premiums; (v) Additional information the commissioner requires; (vi) Amount of aggregate tax remitted to this state; and (vii) Amount of aggregate tax due or remitted to each other state for which an allocation is made pursuant to W.S.

26-11-118

”; in (c) substituted “An alternative reporting” for “More frequent reporting” and added “period” following “payment”; and repealed (d), which read “The report shall include the surplus lines broker's affidavit as to the diligent effort to place coverages with admitted insurers and the results thereof.”

§ 26-11-118.
Tax on surplus lines.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 103, § 3.

In addition to the full amount of gross premiums charged by the insurer for the insurance, every surplus lines broker shall collect and pay to the commissioner a sum equal to three percent (3%) of the gross premiums charged, less any return premiums, for surplus lines insurance provided by the surplus lines broker. Where the insurance covers properties, risks or exposures located or to be performed both in and out of Wyoming, the sum payable shall be computed based on:

An amount equal to three percent (3%) on that portion of the gross premiums allocated to this state; plus

An amount equal to the portion of the premiums allocated to other states or territories on the basis of the tax rates and fees applicable to other properties, risks or exposures located or to be performed outside of Wyoming; less

The amount of gross premiums allocated to this state and returned to the insured.

The tax on any portion of the premium unearned at termination of insurance having been credited by the state to the surplus lines broker shall be returned to the policyholder directly by the surplus lines broker. The surplus lines broker is prohibited from rebating, for any reason, any part of the tax.

At the time of filing an affidavit report required by W.S.

26-11-117

, each surplus lines broker shall pay the premium tax due for each calendar quarter’s business as reported, in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. An alternative reporting and payment period may be required by participation in a multistate compact, reciprocal agreement or clearinghouse pursuant to subsection (g) of this section. The surplus lines broker shall pay interest on the amount of any delinquent tax due, at the rate of nine percent (9%) per year, compounded annually, beginning the day the amount becomes delinquent.

If a surplus lines policy procured through a surplus lines broker covers properties, risks or exposures only partially located or to be performed in Wyoming, the tax due shall be computed on the portions of the premiums which are attributable to the properties, risks or exposures located or to be performed in this state. In determining the amount of premiums taxable in Wyoming, all premiums written, procured or received in Wyoming shall be considered written on properties, risks or exposures located or to be performed in Wyoming, except premiums which are properly allocated or apportioned and reported as taxable premiums of a reciprocal state.

The commissioner may participate in a multistate compact, reciprocal agreement or clearinghouse with other states for the purpose of collecting, allocating and disbursing any funds collected pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. To the extent that other states where portions of the properties, risks or exposures reside have failed to enter into a compact or reciprocal allocation procedure with Wyoming, the net premium tax collected shall be retained by this state.

The commissioner is authorized to utilize the allocation schedule included in the nonadmitted insurance multistate agreement for the purpose of allocating risk and computing the tax due on the portion of premium attributable to each risk classification and to each state where properties, risks or exposures are located.

The clearinghouse is authorized to collect from the surplus lines broker a reasonable service fee, as approved by the commissioner, as a percentage of total gross premiums of each surplus lines policy or document reported under this chapter to cover the cost of administrative services of the clearinghouse. The service fee shall be paid by the insured.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 225; W.S. 1957, 26.1-225; Laws 1971, ch. 57, § 1; 1977, ch. 24, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2011, ch. 103, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a) and (b) which read: “Annually, on or before March 1, each broker shall remit to the commissioner a tax at the rate of three percent (3%) on the premiums, less the amount of return premium on cancelled policies, including sums collected to cover federal and state taxes on surplus line insurance, subject to tax, transacted with unauthorized insurers during the preceding calendar year as shown by his annual statement filed with the commissioner.
(b) If a surplus line policy covers risks or exposures only partially in this state, the tax payable shall be computed upon the proportion of the premium which is properly allocable to the risks or exposures located in this state,” and added (c) through (g).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “broker” for “producer” throughout the section; deleted “assessments, membership fees, subscriber fees, policy fees and service fees” after “premiums charged” in (c); in (e), substituted “report” for “statement,” and added the present last sentence; and added (h).

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (e) substituted “At the time of filing an affidavit report required by W.S.

26-11-117

” for “Annually, on or before March 1” and “each calendar quarter's business as reported, in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. An alternative reporting and payment period may be required” for “the policies written during the preceding calendar year as shown by his annual report filed with the commissioner unless more frequent reporting and payment is required”; and added (j).

§ 26-11-119.
Failure to file report or pay tax; penalty.

Any licensed surplus lines broker or insured who independently procures insurance, who fails to file a report in the form and within the time required or provided for in W.S.

26-11-117

or

26-11-124

may be fined up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day for each day the delinquency continues, beginning the day after the report was due until the date the report is received. The surplus lines broker or insured who independently procures insurance shall pay interest on the amount of any delinquent tax due as required by W.S. 26-11-118(e).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 226; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-226; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provision as to distraint and sale of goods for taxes, see §

39-13-108

.

The 2012 amendment,

rewrote the section, which formerly read: “If any broker fails to file his annual statement, or fails to remit the tax provided by W.S.

26-11-118

, prior to April 1 after the tax is due, and if in the commissioner's opinion the failure is without just cause, the broker is liable for a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) fine for each day of delinquency commencing with April 1. The tax may be collected by distraint, or the tax and fine may be recovered by an action the commissioner institutes in any court of competent jurisdiction.”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 26-11-120.
Service of process against nonadmitted insurer.

A nonadmitted insurer shall be sued, upon any cause of action arising in this state under any contract it issues as a nonadmitted insurance contract pursuant to this chapter, in the district court of the county in which the cause of action arises.

Legal process against the insurer in any action specified in subsection (a) of this section may be served upon the commissioner as provided in W.S.

26-3-122

. The commissioner shall immediately mail a copy of the process served to the person the insurer designates in the policy for that purpose, by prepaid registered or certified mail with return receipt requested. After service of process upon the commissioner in accordance with this section, the court has jurisdiction in personam of the insurer.

A nonadmitted insurer issuing a policy is deemed to have authorized service of process against it in the manner and to the effect provided in this section. The policy shall contain a provision stating the substance of this section and designating the person to whom the commissioner shall mail process as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 227; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-227; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

in (a), substituted “A nonadmitted” for “An unauthorized,” and substituted “nonadmitted insurance” for “surplus line.”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) substituted “A nonadmitted insurer” for “An unauthorized insurer.”

§ 26-11-121.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall make or may approve and adopt reasonable rules and regulations, consistent with this chapter, for any of the following purposes:

Carrying out of this chapter;

Establishment of procedures through which eligibility of particular proposed coverages for export is determined; and

Establishment, procedures and operations of any voluntary organization of brokers or others designed to assist those brokers to comply with this chapter.

The rules and regulations are subject to the procedures and carry the penalty provided by W.S.

26-2-110

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 228; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-228; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-11-122.
Disclosure to commissioner of insurance placed with nonadmitted insurer.

Any person for whom insurance is placed with an nonadmitted insurer, upon the commissioner’s order, shall produce for his examination all policies and other documents evidencing the insurance and shall disclose to the commissioner the amount of gross premiums paid or agreed to be paid for the insurance. If the person refuses to obey the commissioner’s order, he is subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

26-1-107

for each refusal.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 230; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-230; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2012, ch. 37, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “nonadmitted” for “unauthorized.”

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 26-11-123.
Interstate insurance regulatory cooperation.

To carry out the purposes of the Nonadmitted and Reinsurance Reform Act of 2010, 15 U.S.C. 8201 et seq., the commissioner may participate in a nonadmitted insurance multistate agreement or compact for the purposes of collecting, allocating and disbursing premium taxes attributable to the placement of nonadmitted insurance, providing for uniform methods of allocation and reporting among nonadmitted insurance risk classifications, sharing information among states relating to nonadmitted insurance premium taxes and providing for the determination of recommended uniform eligibility standards for nonadmitted insurers.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 103, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 103, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 26-11-124.
Independently procured insurance; duty to report and pay tax.

Each insured whose home state is this state and who independently procures, continues or renews insurance with a nonadmitted insurer, other than insurance procured through a surplus lines broker, shall, within forty-five (45) days after the date the insurance was so procured, continued or renewed, file a report with the commissioner, in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, showing the name and address of the insured or insureds, name and address of the insurer, the subject of insurance, a general description of the coverage, the amount of premium currently charged and additional pertinent information requested by the commissioner.

The insured is subject to the same tax and clearinghouse service fee payment requirements as apply to a surplus lines broker in W.S.

26-11-118

.

This section does not abrogate or modify, and shall not be construed or deemed to abrogate or modify any other provision of this chapter.

This section does not authorize independent procurement of accident and health or sickness or disability insurance.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 1; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “whose home state is this state and who independently procures” for “in this state who procures,” deleted “on properties, risks or exposures located or to be performed in whole or in part in this state” following “nonadmitted insurer,” and substituted “in the form and manner prescribed” for “upon forms prescribed”; in (b) deleted “At the time of filing the report required in subsection (a) of this section” at the beginning and substituted “tax and clearinghouse service fee payment” for “tax payment”; and added (d).

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 37, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.